hu: Játékkészlet telepítési típusa: Szabadon álló; Földhöz rögzített (karókkal/horgonyokkal); Földbe ágyazott (beton alapozással); Dobogóra/teraszra szerelt; Fára szerelt; Egyéb
sk-SK: Typ montáže hernej zostavy: Voľne stojace; Ukotvené do zeme (kolíky/kotvy); Zapustené do zeme (betónové pätky); Montáž na plošinu/terasu; Montáž na strom; Iné
lt-LT: Žaidimų aikštelės įrengimo būdas: Laisvai statomas; Tvirtinama prie žemės (smeigai / inkarai); Įkasama į žemę (betoniniai pamatai); Tvirtinama ant platformos / terasos; Tvirtinama prie medžio; Kita
th: ประเภทการติดตั้งชุดสนามเด็กเล่น: แบบตั้งพื้น; ยึดกับพื้นดิน (สมอบก/ที่ยึด); ฝังดิน (ฐานคอนกรีต); ติดตั้งบนแพลตฟอร์ม/ระเบียง; ติดตั้งบนต้นไม้; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Vrsta ugradnje seta za igru: Samostojeće; Usidreno u tlo (klinovi/sidra); U tlu (betonski temelji); Montirano na platformu / drvenu terasu; Montirano na drvo; Ostalo
ru: Тип установки игрового набора: Отдельно стоящий; Крепление к земле (колышки/анкеры); В землю (бетонные опоры); Установка на платформу/палубу; Установка на дерево; Другое
sv: Typ av installation för lekset: Fristående; Markförankrad (pinnar/ankare); Nedgrävd (betongplintar); Monterad på plattform/däck; Trädmonterad; Övrigt
sl-SI: Vrsta namestitve igralnega kompleta: Prostostoječe; Zasidrano v tla (klini/sidra); Vgrajeno v tla (betonski temelji); Pritrjeno na ploščad/teraso; Pritrjeno na drevo; Drugo
it: Tipo di installazione del playset: Autoportante; Fissato a terra (picchetti/ancore); Interrato (basi in cemento); Montato su piattaforma/pavimentazione; Montato su albero; Altro
el: Τύπος εγκατάστασης σετ παιχνιδιού: Ελεύθερης τοποθέτησης; Στερέωση στο έδαφος (πάσσαλοι/άγκιστρα); Στο έδαφος (βάσεις από σκυρόδεμα); Τοποθέτηση σε πλατφόρμα/κατάστρωμα; Τοποθέτηση σε δέντρο; Άλλο
cs: Způsob instalace herní sady: Volně stojící; Ukotvené do země (kolíky/kotvy); Zapuštěné (betonové patky); Upevněné na plošinu/palubu; Upevněné na strom; Jiné
es: Tipo de instalación del set de juego: Independiente; Anclado al suelo (estacas/anclajes); Bajo tierra (bases de concreto); Montado en plataforma/terraza; Montado en árbol; Otro
fr: Type d'installation de l'aire de jeux: Autonome; Ancré au sol (piquets/ancres); Enterré (semelles en béton); Monté sur plateforme/monté sur terrasse; Monté dans un arbre; Autre
pt-PT: Tipo de instalação do conjunto de recreação: Independente; Fixado ao solo (estacas/âncoras); Enterrado (bases de betão); Montado em plataforma/deck; Montado em árvore; Outra
ja: プレイセット取り付けタイプ: 自立式; 地上固定 (杭/アンカー); 地中埋め込み式 (コンクリート基礎); プラットフォームマウント/デッキマウント; ツリーマウント; その他
ko: 플레이세트 설치 유형: 스탠드형; 지면 고정형(말뚝/앵커); 지면 매립형(콘크리트 기반); 플랫폼 장착/데크 장착; 나무 장착형; 기타
nb: Installasjonstype for lekesett: Frittstående; Forankret i bakken (plugger/ankre); Nedgravd (betongfundament); Plattformmontert/dekkmontert; Tremontert; Annet
da: Installationstype for legesæt: Fritstående; Forankret i jorden (pløkker/ankre); I jorden (betonfundamenter); Monteret på platform/dæk; Monteret i træ; Andet
ro-RO: Tipul de instalare a setului de joacă: Independent (fără fixare); Ancorat în sol (țăruși/ancore); În sol (fundații de beton); Montat pe platformă/terasă; Montat în copac; Altele
bg-BG: Тип инсталация на детска площадка: Свободностоящи; Закрепване за земята (колчета/анкери); Вкопани в земята (бетонни основи); Монтирани на платформа/палуба; Монтирани на дърво; Други
pl: Typ montażu zestawu do zabawy: Wolnostojący; Kotwiony do podłoża (paliki/kotwy); Wkopywany (stopy betonowe); Montowany na platformie/podeście; Montowany na drzewie; Inny
nl: Installatietype speeltoestel: Vrijstaand; In de grond verankerd (haringen/ankers); Ingebouwd (betonnen fundering); Op platform of dek gemonteerd; Aan boom gemonteerd; Overig
de: Montageart des Spielgeräts: Freistehend; Im Boden verankert (Heringe/Bodenanker); Eingegraben (Betonfundamente); Auf Plattform/Terrasse montiert; Am Baum montiert; Sonstige
fi: Leikkisetin asennustyyppi: Vapaasti seisova; Maahan ankkuroitu (kiilat/ankkurit); Maahan upotettu (betonianturat); Alustalle/terassille asennettava; Puuhun asennettava; Muu
zh-TW: 玩具組安裝類型: 獨立式; 落地式 (木樁/地錨); 入地式 (混凝土基礎); 平台安裝/露台安裝; 樹上安裝; 其他
zh-CN: 玩具套装安装类型: 独立式; 地面固定（木桩/地锚）; 埋地（混凝土底座）; 平台安装/露台安装; 树上安装; 其他
en: Playset installation type: Freestanding; Ground-anchored (stakes/anchors); In-ground (concrete footings); Platform-mounted/deck-mounted; Tree-mounted; Other
pt-BR: Playground, tipo de instalação: Independente; Fixado no solo (estacas/âncoras); Enterrado (sapatas de concreto); Montado em plataforma/deck; Montado em árvore; Outro
tr: Oyun seti kurulum tipi: Bağımsız; Zemine sabitlenen (kazık/ankraj); Zemin içi (beton temeller); Platforma/zemin kaplamasına monte; Ağaca monte; Diğer
vi: Kiểu lắp đặt bộ đồ chơi vận động: Đứng độc lập; Gắn trên mặt đất (cọc/neo); Chôn dưới đất (chân đế bê tông); Gắn trên bục/bề mặt nổi; Gắn trên cây; Khác